Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.190

Schedule of rates and charges.

No person shall operate a public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale unless that person has filed a schedule with the application for license to operate a public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale. The schedule shall show all rates and charges for stockyard services to be furnished at the public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale.

(1) Schedules shall be posted conspicuously at the public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale, and shall plainly state all rates and charges in such detail as the director may require, and shall state any rules which in any manner change, affect, or determine any part of the aggregate of the rates or charges, or the value of the stockyard services furnished. The director may determine and prescribe the form and manner in which the schedule shall be prepared, arranged, and posted.

(2) No changes shall be made in rates or charges so filed and published except after thirty days' notice to the director and to the public filed and posted as set forth under this section, which shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made and the time the changes will go into effect.

(3) No licensee shall charge, demand, or collect a greater or a lesser or a different compensation for a service than the rates and charges specified in the schedule filed with the director and in effect at the time; nor shall a licensee refund or remit in any manner any portion of the rates or charges so specified (but this shall not prohibit a cooperative association of producers from properly returning to its members, on a patronage basis, its excess earnings on their livestock); nor shall a licensee extend to any person at a public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale any stockyard services except as are specified in the schedule.

[ 2003 c 326 s 75; 1983 c 298 s 12; 1959 c 107 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.